New Jersey, session 221, S2412.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 27 of P.L.1966, c.217 (C.43:15A-57.2) to the contrary, the cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions of subsection a. of section 27 of P.L.1966, c.217 (C.43:15A-57.2) shall not apply to a former member of the Public Employees Retirement System who is a non-instructional staff member and who, after having been granted a retirement allowance, becomes employed by a board of education in a position of critical need as determined by the State Commissioner of Education on a contractual basis for a term of not more than one year; except that the cancellation, reenrollment, and additional retirement allowance provisions shall apply if the former member becomes employed within 120 days with the employer from which the member retired.  Nothing herein shall preclude a former member so reemployed with a board of education from renewing a contract for one additional year; provided that the total period of employment with any individual board of education does not exceed a two-year period, unless so approved by the Commissioner of Education as being in the best interests of the school district; and provided that no such renewal shall provide the former member an election regarding whether or not to be reenrolled. The former members retirement shall have been a bona fide retirement and any employment or reemployment under this section shall not be prearranged before retirement. b.    A school district of a board of education with a position of critical need, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, seeking to reemploy a former member pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section shall demonstrate to the board of education the need for reemploying such members prior to reemployment by the board of education. This section shall apply only with regard to a non-instructional staff member whose reemployment with any board of education commences during the remainder of the 2023-2024 school year and the entirety of the 2024-2025 school year. c.     As used in this section, non-instructional staff member means a New Jersey school-based employee whose position does not require a New Jersey Department of Education certification and who is or was enrolled in the Public Employees Retirement System. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.